Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-520
Audiologist or speech-language pathology assistant; supervision; termination.

(1) The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall approve an application submitted by an audiologist or speech-language pathologist for supervision of an audiology or speech-language pathology assistant when:

(a) The audiology or speech-language pathology assistant meets the requirements for registration pursuant to section 38-519;

(b) The audiologist or speech-language pathologist has a valid Nebraska license or a privilege to practice audiology or speech-language pathology under the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact; and

(c) The audiologist or speech-language pathologist practices in Nebraska.

(2) Any audiologist or speech-language pathologist seeking approval for supervision of an audiology or speech-language pathology assistant shall submit an application which is signed by the audiology or speech-language pathology assistant and the audiologist or speech-language pathologist with whom he or she is associated. Such application shall (a) identify the settings within which the audiology or speech-language pathology assistant is authorized to practice, (b) describe the agreed-upon functions that the audiology or speech-language pathology assistant may perform as provided in section 38-523, and (c) describe the provision for supervision by an alternate audiologist or speech-language pathologist when necessary.

(3) If the supervision of an audiology or speech-language pathology assistant is terminated by the audiologist, speech-language pathologist, or audiology or speech-language pathology assistant, the audiologist or speech-language pathologist shall notify the department of such termination. An audiologist or speech-language pathologist who thereafter assumes the responsibility for such supervision shall obtain a certificate of approval to supervise an audiology or speech-language pathology assistant from the department prior to the use of the audiology or speech-language pathology assistant in the practice of audiology or speech-language pathology.

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 24;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 30;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 70;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,195.02;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 30;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 205;

Laws 2021, LB14, § 4.

Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact, see section 38-4101.